Utah statutes.
75-2-212.   Right of election personal to surviving spouse -- Incapacitated
surviving spouse -- Custodial trust.
(1)  The right of election may be exercised only by a surviving spouse who is
living when the petition for the elective share is filed in the court under
Subsection 75-2-211(1).  If the election is not exercised by the surviving
spouse personally, it may be exercised on the surviving spouse's behalf by his
conservator, guardian, or agent under the authority of a power of attorney.
(2)  If the election is exercised on behalf of a surviving spouse who is an
incapacitated person, the court shall set aside that portion of the elective-
share and supplemental elective-share amounts due from the decedent's probate
estate and recipients of the decedent's nonprobate transfers to others under
Subsections 75-2-209(2) and (3) and shall appoint a trustee to administer that
property for the support of the surviving spouse.  For the purposes of this
subsection, an election on behalf of a surviving spouse by an agent under a
durable power of attorney is presumed to be on behalf of a surviving spouse
who is an incapacitated person.  The trustee shall administer the trust in
accordance with the following terms and such additional terms as the court
determines appropriate:
(a)  Expenditures of income and principal may be made in the manner, when, and
to the extent that the trustee determines suitable and proper for the
surviving spouse's support, without court order but with regard to other
support, income, and property of the surviving spouse exclusive of benefits of
medical or other forms of assistance from any state or federal government or
governmental agency for which the surviving spouse shall qualify on the basis
of need.
(b)  During the surviving spouse's incapacity, neither the surviving spouse
nor anyone acting on behalf of the surviving spouse has a power to terminate
the trust;  but if the surviving spouse regains capacity, the surviving spouse
then acquires the power to terminate the trust and acquire full ownership of
the trust property free of trust, by delivering to the trustee a writing
signed by the surviving spouse declaring the termination.
(c)  Upon the surviving spouse's death, the trustee shall transfer the
unexpended trust property in the following order:
(i)  under the residuary clause, if any, of the will of the predeceased spouse
against whom the elective share was taken, as if that predeceased spouse died
immediately after the surviving spouse; or
(ii)  to the predeceased spouse's heirs under Section 75-2-711.
